Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202586-1086
Federal or other funds; commission; powers; immunity.

The commission may apply for or assist any political subdivision in applying for any federal or other funds available for 911 service and may distribute federal funds consistent with federal law and other funds consistent with the directives, purposes, or conditions of such other funds. Except for intentional acts, the commission shall be immune from liability or the payment of damages in assisting any political subdivision in applying for any such federal funds.

Laws 2005, LB 516, § 2;

R.S.1943, (2024), § 86-441.01;

Laws 2025, LB362, § 68.